Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.030

Minimum amount of permanent stock required—Preferred or special classes of shares authorized.

Stock associations shall have permanent stock which may be issued with or without par value but with a statement of value of nonpar stock in accordance with Title 23B RCW. The minimum amount of such stock shall be twenty-five thousand dollars in the case of associations outside of incorporated cities, or in cities of less than twenty-five thousand population. Associations located in cities of greater population shall have as a minimum, fifty thousand dollars of such stock. The board of such association is authorized and directed to issue and maintain the stock in the following percentages: Three percent upon the first five million dollars; two percent upon the next three million dollars, and one percent upon all additional withdrawable savings: PROVIDED, That associations whose savings are insured by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation shall not be required to maintain stock in excess of three hundred thousand dollars. A stock association may issue preferred or special classes of shares as provided in chapter 23B.06 RCW.

[ 1991 c 72 s 52; 1982 c 3 s 92; 1981 c 84 s 1; 1969 c 107 s 7; 1963 c 246 s 9; 1955 c 122 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.